Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-205
Amendments proposed by Legislature; election; vote required for adoption; proclamation by Governor.

If a majority of the electors voting on any such amendment adopt the same, provided the votes cast in favor of such amendment shall not be less than thirty-five percent of the total votes cast at such election, the Governor, within ten days after the result is ascertained, shall make proclamation declaring the proposed amendment or amendments to be a part of the Constitution of the state.

Laws 1877, § 5, p. 115;

R.S.1913, § 3702;

C.S.1922, § 3090;

Laws 1925, c. 112, § 4, p. 304;

C.S.1929, § 49-205;

R.S.1943, § 49-205.

Constitutional amendment, to exclude schools of deaf and blind from jurisdiction of Board of Control, was ineffective for failure to comply with requirements. State ex rel. Hall v. Cline, 118 Neb. 150, 224 N.W. 6 (1929).